Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1146
Inspection of practice location.

All practice locations of a dentist applying for a permit to administer general anesthesia or deep sedation, moderate sedation, or minimal sedation may be inspected at the discretion of the board. The board may contract to have such inspections performed. The board shall not delegate authority to review and to make recommendations on permit applications or to determine the persons or facilities to be inspected.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.32;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 479;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 16.